Utah statutes.
36-16a-103.   Lieutenant governor's duties.

(1)  After receipt of a joint resolution on an opinion question that has been submitted under Section 36-16a-102, the lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  submit the opinion question to the legal voters of Utah as required by resolution;

(b)  comply with the procedures of Section 36-16a-106; and

(c)  except as provided in Section 36-16a-105, comply with all relevant provisions of Title 20A, Election Code, relating to the conduct of elections.

(2)  The lieutenant governor may establish additional requirements for election officials to facilitate the conduct of the election.

